Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-907
Solar skyspace, defined.

Solar skyspace shall mean the space between a solar energy collector and the sun which must remain unobstructed in order to assure reasonable operation of the solar energy system.

Laws 1979, LB 353, § 7.